Utah statutes.
63F-1-402.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter, "enterprise architecture" means information
technology assets and functions that can be applied across state government
and include:
(1)  computing devices such as mainframes, servers, desktop devices, and
peripherals;
(2)  networks;
(3)  enterprise wide applications;
(4)  maintenance and help desk functions for common hardware and applications;
(5)  standards for other computing devices, operating systems, common
applications, and software; and
(6)  master contracts that are available for use by agencies for various
systems such as operating systems, database, enterprise resource planning and
customer relationship management software, application development services,
and enterprise integration.
